Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2918
Treatment-related tasks, defined.

Treatment-related tasks means activities related to the practice of physical therapy that do not require the clinical decisionmaking of a physical therapist or the clinical problem solving of a physical therapist assistant.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 136;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,380;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1011.